lexc/noun/enhufnevek.lexc
LEXICON Case1szelt
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

! esztendő:esztend
!LEXICON AddNounesztendo
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Case1esztendo;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possesztendo;

!LEXICON Possesztendo
!+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^eje   Famesztendo;   ! ja, je, a,e
!+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^ejük   Famesztendo;   ! ük, uk
!+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^eim   Famesztendo;   ! aim
!+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^eid   Famesztendo;   ! aid
!+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^ei   Famesztendo;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
!+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^eink   Famesztendo;   ! aink, eink
!+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^eitek   Famesztendo;  ! aitok, eitek
!+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^eik   Famesztendo;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik

!LEXICON Famesztendo
!+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genesztendo;
!                       Genesztendo;

!LEXICON Genesztendo
!+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseesztendo;
!+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseesztendo;
!                       Caseesztendo;

!LEXICON Caseesztendo
!+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
!+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
!+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
!+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
!+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
!+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
!+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
!+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
!+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
!+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
!!+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
!+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
!+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
!+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
!+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
!+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
!+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
!+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

!LEXICON Case1esztendo
!+Ter:^+cTer^eig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON AddNounot
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possot;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurot;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famot;

LEXICON Possot
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoe§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Famot;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Famot;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famot;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famot;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famot;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famot;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famot;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famot;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famot;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famot;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famot;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famot;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famot1;

LEXICON Plurot
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Genot;
                            Genot1;
        
LEXICON Famot
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genot;
                       Genot;
LEXICON Famot1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genot;
                       Genot1;

LEXICON Genot
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseot;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseot;
                       Caseot;
LEXICON Genot1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseot;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseot;
                       Caseot1;
 
LEXICON Caseot
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Caseot1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoe§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t rajzot
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

!atya:aty
LEXICON AddNounatya
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possatya;

LEXICON Possatya
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famatya;   ! ja, je, a,e
!+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famatya;   ! unk, ünk
!+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Famatya;   ! etek, atok
!+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famatya;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famatya;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famatya;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famatya;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famatya;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famatya;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famatya;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                           Famatya;

        
LEXICON Famatya
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genatya;
                       Genatya;

LEXICON Genatya
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Caseatya;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseatya;
                       Caseatya;
 
LEXICON Caseatya
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounoe
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Pluroe;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Pluroe
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez5§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
! seb, sebe
LEXICON AddNounjnull
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possjnull;

LEXICON Noun
ajánlóvers AddNounot;
alakvers AddNounot;
alaprajz AddNounot;
alapvers AddNounot;
albumvers AddNounot;
antológiavers AddNounot;
anyavers AddNounot;
apavers AddNounot;
apostolvers AddNounot;
aranyvers AddNounot;
arcképvers AddNounot;
aszfaltvers AddNounot;
atya:aty AddNounatya;
autóvers AddNounot;
balsors AddNounot;
barátságvers AddNounot;
beszédvers AddNounot;
betétvers AddNounot;
betűvers AddNounot;
bibliavers AddNounot;
birs AddNounot;
blankvers AddNounot;
bors AddNounot;
borvers AddNounot;
borz AddNounot;
briliáns AddNounot;
bringavers AddNounot;
bujdosóvers AddNounot;
békevers AddNounot;
bélyegzővers AddNounot;
bérházvers AddNounot;
bérvers AddNounot;
bíborbirs AddNounot;
bókvers AddNounot;
bökvers AddNounot;
börtönvers AddNounot;
búcsúvers AddNounot;
büntetővers AddNounot;
ciklusvers AddNounot;
családatya:családaty AddNounatya;
családvers AddNounot;
csapatvers AddNounot;
csavargóvers AddNounot;
cserkészvers AddNounot;
csillagvers AddNounot;
csodavers AddNounot;
csomagvers AddNounot;
csúfvers AddNounot;
cukorkavers AddNounot;
címadóvers AddNounot;
címervers AddNounot;
címrajz AddNounot;
címvers AddNounot;
dalvers AddNounot;
dicsérővers AddNounot;
druidavers AddNounot;
dátumvers AddNounot;
egyházatya:egyházaty AddNounatya;
emblémavers AddNounot;
esszévers AddNounot;
fantáziavers AddNounot;
feladatvers AddNounot;
felelős AddNounoe;
filmvers AddNounot;
fogolyvers AddNounot;
formavers AddNounot;
fényvers AddNounot;
földrajz AddNounot;
fűzfavers AddNounot;
grenadírmars AddNounot;
gyermekvers AddNounot;
gyökérvers AddNounot;
gépvers AddNounot;
hadifogolyvers AddNounot;
halandzsavers AddNounot;
haragvers AddNounot;
hazugságvers AddNounot;
hegyrajz AddNounot;
helyszínrajz AddNounot;
homlokrajz AddNounot;
honatya:honaty AddNounatya;
hátlapvers AddNounot;
hódolóvers AddNounot;
idővers AddNounot;
ikervers AddNounot;
indítóvers AddNounot;
istenvers AddNounot;
japánbirs AddNounot;
játékvers AddNounot;
jósvers AddNounot;
kamaszvers AddNounot;
kaszavers AddNounot;
keresztvers AddNounot;
kerékpárvers AddNounot;
kiolvasóvers AddNounot;
kiáltványvers AddNounot;
kocsmavers AddNounot;
konyhavers AddNounot;
korálvers AddNounot;
kultuszvers AddNounot;
körvers AddNounot;
köszöntővers AddNounot;
közérzetvers AddNounot;
lelkiatya:lelkiaty AddNounatya;
leltárvers AddNounot;
locsolkodóvers AddNounot;
lágervers AddNounot;
látomásvers AddNounot;
látványvers AddNounot;
mackóvers AddNounot;
magyarbors AddNounot;
magányvers AddNounot;
mellékvers AddNounot;
mestervers AddNounot;
mintavers AddNounot;
montázsvers AddNounot;
mozaikvers AddNounot;
munkásvers AddNounot;
nagyatya:nagyaty AddNounatya;
napfényvers AddNounot;
naptárvers AddNounot;
neszvers AddNounot;
nosztalgiavers AddNounot;
nászatya:nászaty AddNounatya;
nászvers AddNounot;
néprajz AddNounot;
panaszvers AddNounot;
pillanatvers AddNounot;
plakátvers AddNounot;
portrévers AddNounot;
propagandavers AddNounot;
prózavers AddNounot;
pásztorvers AddNounot;
példavers AddNounot;
rabvers AddNounot;
refrénvers AddNounot;
reklámvers AddNounot;
roncsvers AddNounot;
rácsvers AddNounot;
résznyitóvers AddNounot;
röpiratvers AddNounot;
sakkvers AddNounot;
seb AddNounjnull;
siratóvers AddNounot;
sorjázóvers AddNounot;
spájz AddNounot;
szabadságvers AddNounot;
szamurájvers AddNounot;
szegfűbors AddNounot;
szentatya:szentaty AddNounatya;
szerepvers AddNounot;
szintézisvers AddNounot;
szoborkorrajz AddNounot;
színészvers AddNounot;
szülőföldvers AddNounot;
sírvers AddNounot;
tanvers AddNounot;
tavaszvers AddNounot;
természetvers AddNounot;
torzrajz AddNounot;
traverz AddNounot;
tudatvers AddNounot;
támadóvers AddNounot;
térd AddNounjnull;
térképvers AddNounot;
törökbors AddNounot;
vadászvers AddNounot;
varázsvers AddNounot;
vers AddNounot;
viccvers AddNounot;
visszhangvers AddNounot;
vonalvers AddNounot;
városatya:városaty AddNounatya;
váteszvers AddNounot;
végítéletvers AddNounot;
vőfélyvers AddNounot;
zsandárvers AddNounot;
zseb AddNounjnull;
zsánervers AddNounot;
záporvers AddNounot;
ábravers AddNounot;
állatsírvers AddNounot;
édesatya:édesaty AddNounatya;
életrajz AddNounot;
énekvers AddNounot;
öntözővers AddNounot;
önéletrajzvers AddNounot;
öttusavers AddNounot;
úttörővers AddNounot;
ősatya:ősaty AddNounatya;
Ders AddNounot;
Lers AddNounot;
Schönherz AddNounot;
